California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Any member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol may remove from the highway and have placed in a storage facility, any vehicle described in subdivision (a) of Section 22406, subdivision (g) of Section 34500, and any motortruck with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 10,000 pounds, which is in an unsafe condition. 

(b) Any member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol may impound any farm labor vehicle operated in violation of subdivision
 (b) of Section 2800, subdivision (a) of Section 24002.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 31402, subject to the following requirements:

(1) A farm labor vehicle impounded for a first violation of subdivision (b) of Section 2800, subdivision (a) of Section 24002.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 31402 may be released within 24 hours upon delivery to the impounding authority of satisfactory proof that the vehicle will be legally moved or transported to a place of repair.

(2) A farm labor vehicle shall be impounded for not less than 10 days for a second violation of subdivision (b) of Section 2800, subdivision (a) of Section 24002.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 31402, or any combination of two of those provisions, if the original equipment or maintenance violation has not been repaired to comply with existing law. The farm labor vehicle shall be released after 10 days upon delivery to
 the impounding authority of satisfactory proof that the vehicle has been repaired to comply with existing law, or upon delivery to the impounding agency of satisfactory proof that the vehicle will be lawfully moved or transported to a place of repair.

(3) A farm labor vehicle shall be impounded for not less than 30 days for a third or subsequent violation of subdivision (b) of Section 2800, subdivision (a) of Section 24002.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 31402, or any combination of three or more of those provisions, if the original equipment or maintenance violation has not been repaired to comply with existing law. The farm labor vehicle shall be released after 30 days upon delivery to the impounding authority of satisfactory proof that the vehicle has been repaired to comply with existing law, or upon delivery to the impounding agency of satisfactory proof that the vehicle will be lawfully moved or transported to a place of repair.

(c) All towing and storage fees for a vehicle removed under this section shall be paid by the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 873, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

34506.5.

(a) A farm labor vehicle is subject to forfeiture as a nuisance if it is driven on a highway in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 2800, subdivision (a) of Section 24002.5, or subdivision (a) of Section 31402 and has been impounded for a second or subsequent time pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 34506.4.

(b) (1) A registered or legal owner of record at the time of impoundment may request a hearing to determine the validity of the
 impoundment pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (n) of Section 14607.6.

(2) If it is determined that the necessary repairs had been completed and the farm labor vehicle complied with existing laws at the time of impoundment, the agency employing the person who directed the impoundment shall be responsible for the costs incurred for towing and storage.

(c) Procedures established in subdivisions (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), (o), (p), (q), (r), (t), (u), and (v) of Section 14607.6 shall be utilized for the forfeiture of an impounded farm labor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 873, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

34507.

To assist the department in enforcing this division, a vehicle that is subject to this division and to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Public Utilities Commission, or the United States Secretary of the Department of Transportation shall have displayed prominently a distinctive identifying symbol as required by Section 34507.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 288, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

34507.5.

(a) A motor carrier, as defined in Section 408, whose principal place of business is in this state, who operates from a terminal in this state, or who is required to be licensed pursuant to Section 32000.5, a motor carrier of property, and a for-hire motor carrier of property, as defined in Section 34601, shall obtain a carrier identification number from the department. Application for a carrier identification number shall be on a form furnished by the department. The department may furnish the form online and require the form to be completed and submitted electronically via the department’s internet website. Information provided in connection with an application for a carrier identification number shall be true and accurate. Information relating
 to a carrier identification number shall be updated by a motor carrier upon
 request from the department and within 15 days of a change of information, or the cessation or resumption of regulated activity at any of the motor carrier’s terminals.

(1) A motor carrier required to obtain a carrier identification number shall first obtain a United States Department of Transportation number from the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration and provide that number on the application for a carrier identification number. The department shall not assign a carrier identification number unless the application includes the United States Department of Transportation number assigned to, and properly identifying, the motor carrier.

(2) A motor carrier shall ensure information associated with the United States Department of Transportation number assigned to the
 motor carrier is true and accurate. The information shall be updated as required by Section 390.19T of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, before the motor carrier operates a commercial motor vehicle, at least once every two calendar years, and within 15 days of any change of information, or cessation or resumption of regulated activity.

(b) The carrier identification number assigned to the motor carrier under whose operating authority or motor carrier permit the vehicle or combination of vehicles is being operated shall be displayed on both sides of each vehicle, or on both sides of at least one motor vehicle in each combination of the following vehicles:

(1) Each vehicle set forth in Section 34500.

(2) A
 motortruck of two or more axles that is more than 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating.

(3) Any other motortruck or motor vehicle used to transport property for compensation.

(c) The carrier identification number of a motor carrier operating a vehicle or combination of vehicles listed in subdivision (b) under a rental agreement with a term of not more than 30 calendar days need not be displayed if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The name or trademark of the lessor are displayed on both sides of each vehicle or on both sides of one of the vehicles in each combination of vehicles.

(2) Any of the following numbers issued to the lessor are displayed
 on both sides of each vehicle or on both sides of one of the vehicles in each combination of vehicles:

(A) The carrier identification number issued by the United States Department of Transportation.

(B) A valid operating authority number.

(C) A valid motor carrier of property number.

(3) (A) A copy of the rental agreement entered into by the lessor and the vehicle operator is in the vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(B) The rental agreement shall be available for inspection immediately upon the request of an authorized employee of the department, a regularly employed and salaried
 police officer or deputy sheriff, or a reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed pursuant to Section 830.6 of the Penal Code.

(C) If the rented vehicle or combination of vehicles is operated in conjunction with a commercial enterprise, the rental agreement shall include the operator’s carrier identification number or motor carrier of property permit number.

(d) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that is in compliance with Section 390.21T of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be deemed to be in compliance with subdivision (c).

(e) This section does not apply to any of the following vehicles:

(1) A vehicle described in
 subdivision (f) of Section 34500, that is operated by a private carrier as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 34601, if the gross vehicle weight rating of the towing vehicle is 10,000 pounds or less, or the towing vehicle is a pickup truck, as defined in Section 471. This exception does not apply to a vehicle combination described in subdivision (k) of Section 34500.

(2) A vehicle described in subdivision (g) of Section 34500, that is operated by a private carrier as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 34601, if the hazardous material transportation does not require the display of placards pursuant to Section 27903, a license pursuant to Section 32000.5, or hazardous waste hauler registration pursuant to Section 25163 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A historical vehicle,
 as described in Section 5004, and a vehicle that displays special identification plates in accordance with Section 5011.

(4) An implement of husbandry as defined in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 36000) of Division 16.

(5) A vehicle owned or operated by an agency of the federal government.

(6) A pickup truck, as defined in Section 471, and a two-axle daily rental truck with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 26,001 pounds, when operated in noncommercial use.

(f) Subdivision (b) does not apply to the following:

(1) A vehicle that displays a valid identification number assigned by the
 United States Secretary of the Department of Transportation.

(2) A vehicle that is regulated by, and that displays a valid operating authority number issued by, the Bureau of Household Goods and Services, including a household mover as defined in Section 19225.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) A for-hire motor carrier of passengers.

(g) The display of the carrier identification number shall be in sharp contrast to the background, and shall be of a size, shape, and color that it is readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 50 feet.

(h) The carrier identification number for a company no longer in business, no longer operating with the same
 name, or no longer operating under the same operating authority, identification number, or motor carrier permit shall be removed before sale, transfer, or other disposal of a vehicle marked pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 23.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

34507.6.

(a) Every operator of transportation service which is exempt from regulation as a charter-party carrier of passengers pursuant to subdivision (k) or (l) of Section 5353 of the Public Utilities Code, and which furnishes that transportation service in a bus, shall obtain a carrier identification number from the Department of the California Highway Patrol. Application for a carrier identification number shall be on a form furnished by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) (1) The carrier identification number so obtained by the
 operator shall be displayed on both sides of each bus used in that transportation service.

(2) The display of the carrier identification number shall be in sharp contrast to the background, and shall be of a size, shape, and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of at least 50 feet.

(3) The carrier identification number shall be removed before the sale, transfer, or other disposal of the bus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1039, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

34508.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall adopt and enforce rules and regulations relating to the equipment, maintenance, construction, design, color, and operation of schoolbuses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 774, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

34509.

Vanpool vehicles, as defined in Section 668, and vanpool vehicles when used for purposes other than traveling to and from a work location and transporting not more than 10 persons including the driver, shall be exempt from the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 34501, except that the following shall apply:

(a) The vanpool vehicle shall be equipped with an operable fire extinguisher which is of the dry chemical or carbon dioxide type with an aggregate rating of at least 4-B:C and which is securely mounted and readily accessible.

(b) The vanpool vehicle shall be equipped with a first aid kit, conforming to the minimum requirements for schoolbuses. First aid kits shall be readily visible, accessible, and plainly marked “First Aid Kit.”

(c) The vanpool vehicle shall be regularly and systematically inspected, maintained, and lubricated in accordance with the manufacturer’s recommendations, or more often if necessary to ensure the safe operating condition of the vehicle. The maintenance shall include, as a minimum, an in-depth inspection of the vehicle’s brake system, steering components, lighting system, and wheels and tires, to be performed at intervals of not more than every six months or 6,000 miles, whichever occurs first.

(d) Operators of vanpool vehicles shall document each systematic inspection, maintenance, and lubrication and repair performed for each vehicle under their control.
 Required records shall include services performed, the person performing the service, the date, and the mileage on the vehicle at the time of the repair. The records shall be maintained with the vehicle for one year, and shall be presented upon demand to any authorized representative of the California Highway Patrol.

(e) Vanpool vehicles being operated pursuant to the exemptions specified in this section shall display, upon the rear and sides of the vehicle, a sign or placard, clearly visible and discernable for a distance of not less than 50 feet, indicating that the vehicle is being used as a vanpool vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 46, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

34510.

Persons operating vehicles, or combinations of vehicles, in the transportation of hazardous material and subject to this division, shall carry in the vehicle while en route any shipping papers required to accompany the vehicle in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to Section 2402. The bill of lading or other shipping paper shall be displayed upon demand of any member of the California Highway Patrol or any police officer of a city who is on duty for the exclusive or main purpose of enforcing the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 504, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

34510.5.

(a) (1) A broker of construction trucking services, as defined in Section 3322 of the Civil Code, shall not furnish construction transportation services to any construction project unless it has secured a surety bond of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) executed by an admitted surety insurer. The surety bond shall ensure the payment of the claims of a contracted motor carrier of property in dump truck equipment if the broker fails to pay the contracted motor carrier within the time period specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3322 of the Civil Code.

(2) (A) A broker of construction trucking services annually shall provide written evidence of the broker’s valid surety bond to a
 third-party nonprofit organization that is related to the industry and regularly maintains a published database of bonded brokers or post a current copy of the surety bond on the broker’s Internet Web site.

(B) When a copy of a surety bond is provided to a third-party nonprofit organization, the broker shall notify the third-party nonprofit organization if at any time the surety bond is cancelled or expired. When a copy of the surety bond is posted on the broker’s Internet Web site, the broker shall remove the copy of the surety bond from his or her Internet Web site if at any time the surety bond is cancelled or expired.

(C) A third-party nonprofit organization shall not charge a broker for posting evidence of a valid surety bond or limit the posting of the bond only to the organization’s members.

(D) A third-party
 nonprofit organization shall not be liable for any damages caused by the publication of any information provided pursuant to this paragraph that is erroneous or outdated.

(b) A broker of construction trucking services shall not hire, or otherwise engage the services of, a motor carrier of property to furnish construction transportation services unless the broker provides, prior to the commencement of work each calendar year, written evidence of the broker’s valid surety bond to any person that hires, or otherwise engages the services of, the broker to furnish construction transportation services and also to the hired motor carrier of property.

(c) A broker of construction trucking services who furnishes construction transportation services in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(d) In any civil action brought against a broker of construction trucking services by a motor carrier of property in dump truck equipment with whom the broker contracted during any period of time in which the broker did not have a surety bond in violation of this section, the failure to have the bond shall create a rebuttable presumption that the broker failed to pay to the motor carrier the amount due and owing.

(e) For purposes of this section, “a broker of construction trucking services” does not include a facility that meets all the following requirements:

(1) Arranges for transportation services of its product.

(2) Primarily handles raw materials to produce a new product.

(3) Is a rock
 product operation (such as an “aggregate” operation), a hot mixing asphalt plant, or a concrete, concrete product, or Portland cement product manufacturing facility.

(4) Does not accept a fee for the arrangement.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “written evidence of the broker’s valid surety bond” includes a copy of the surety bond, a certificate of insurance, a continuation certificate, or other similar documentation originally issued from the surety that includes the surety’s and broker’s name, the bond number, and the effective and expiration dates of the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 197.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

34511.

Any violation of any provision of this division or regulation adopted pursuant thereto may be enjoined in a civil action brought by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the State of California, upon request of the department, except that it shall not be necessary to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show irreparable damage or loss.

The department may not submit a request for civil action and the Attorney General may not bring action pursuant to this section unless the person charged with a violation of this division or regulation adopted pursuant thereto fails to take corrective action after
 being notified of the violation by the department, in writing, on at least two occasions over a 60-day period. Prior to the submission of the department’s request for civil action, the person charged shall receive, at his or her request, a departmental hearing on the matter and the department’s request for civil action shall be forwarded by the department to, and approved by, the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 789, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

34513.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations relating to the equipment and maintenance of tour buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1306, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

34514.

(a) Beginning with the 1990–91 fiscal year, the department shall, upon appropriation of the requisite funds by the Legislature, annually conduct additional roadside vehicle safety inspections of vehicles described in Section 34501.12. These roadside inspections shall be in addition to the maintenance facility and terminal inspections required by that section, and over and above the number of roadside vehicle safety inspections conducted during the 1987–88 fiscal year.

(b) It is
 the intent of the Legislature that, beginning with the 1990–91 fiscal year, funds are to be appropriated to the department annually, for the purposes of subdivision (a), from the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, to the extent that sufficient funds are collected pursuant to Section 34501.12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 100.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

34515.

(a) As used in this division and in regulations adopted pursuant to this division, “maintenance facility or terminal” means any place or places where a vehicle of a type listed in Section 34500 is regularly garaged or maintained, or from which it is operated or dispatched. “Maintenance facility or terminal” includes a private business or residence.

(b) For the purpose of the inspections conducted pursuant to Section 34501.12, “terminal” means the location or locations in this state that are designated by a motor carrier, where subject vehicles may be inspected by the department and where vehicle maintenance and inspection records and drivers’ records will be made available for inspection.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 500, Sec. 12.   (AB 529)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

34516.

(a) No person shall use or arrange for the use of a refrigerated motor vehicle, tank truck, dry van, or other motor vehicle, to provide transportation of food products for human consumption if the vehicle has been used to transport solid waste destined for landfills, or if precluded from use in accordance with subdivision (c).

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(c) If, pursuant to a federal statute having the same purposes as the act which added this section to the Public Utilities Code during
 the 1990 portion of the 1989–90 Regular Session, the United States Secretary of Transportation publishes a list of categories of solid waste or hazardous substances which he or she determines make food unsafe as a result of having been transported in a refrigerated motor vehicle, tank truck, dry van, or other motor vehicle also used to transport food products for human consumption, subdivisions (a) and (b) apply to those substances.

(d) A person or corporation charged with a violation of this section may avoid liability upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the transportation alleged to violate this section did not in fact endanger the public health, due to the specific protective or remedial actions taken by the person or corporation charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1685, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

34517.

(a) With respect to a commercial motor vehicle from another country, a person shall not operate the vehicle outside the boundaries of a designated commercial zone unless the required operating authority from the United States Secretary of the Department of Transportation has first been obtained.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) is an infraction punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, shall issue a citation for a violation of subdivision (a) to the driver of the vehicle and order the driver of the vehicle to return the vehicle to its country of origin. The peace officer may impound a vehicle cited pursuant to this section and its cargo until the citation and all charges related to the impoundment are cleared. The impoundment charges are the responsibility of the vehicle’s owner.

(d) As used in this section, “designated commercial zone” means a commercial zone, as defined in Part 372 (commencing with Section 372.101) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 288, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

34518.

(a) A foreign motor carrier or foreign private motor carrier required to have a certificate of registration issued by the United States Secretary of the Department of Transportation pursuant to Part 368 (commencing with Section 368.1), or required to be registered pursuant to Part 365 (commencing with Section 365.101), of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall not do any of the following:

(1) Operate in this state without the required certificate in the vehicle.

(2) Operate beyond the limitations or restrictions specified in the certificate as issued.

(3) Refuse to show the certificate upon request of a peace officer.

(4) Provide point-to-point transportation services, including express delivery services, within the United States for goods other than international cargo.

(b) A motor carrier required to be registered with the United States Secretary of the Department of Transportation pursuant to Section 13902 of Title 49 of the United States Code, Part 365 (commencing with Section 365.101), Part 390 (commencing with Section 390.1), or Section 392.9a of Title 49 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations shall not do any of the following:

(1) Operate in this state without the required registration.

(2) Operate beyond the limitations or restrictions specified in its registration.

(3) Operate in this state without the required operating authority.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) or (b) is an infraction punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) A member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol may impound a vehicle operated in violation of subdivision (a) or (b) and its cargo, until the citation and all charges related to the impoundment are cleared. The impoundment charges are the responsibility of the vehicle’s owner.

(e) (1) A motor carrier granted permanent operating authority pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not operate a vehicle on a highway, unless the vehicle is inspected by a Commercial Vehicle Safety Alliance-certified inspector every three months and displays a current safety inspection decal attesting to the successful completion of those inspections for at least three years after receiving permanent operating authority.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a motor carrier granted authority to operate solely in a commercial zone on the United States-Mexico International Border.

(f) As used in this section “limitations” or “restrictions” include definitions of “commercial zones,” “municipality,” “contiguous municipalities,” “unincorporated area,” and “terminal areas,” in Part 372 (commencing with
 Section 372.101) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 48.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

34520.

(a) Motor carriers and drivers shall comply with the controlled substances and alcohol use, transportation, and testing requirements of the United States Secretary of Transportation as set forth in Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101) of, and Sections 392.4 and 392.5 of, Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) (1) A motor carrier shall make available for inspection, upon the request of an authorized employee of the department, copies of all results and other records pertaining to controlled substances and alcohol use and testing conducted pursuant to federal law, as specified in subdivision (a), including those records contained in individual
 driver qualification files.

(2) For the purposes of complying with the return-to-duty alcohol or controlled substances test requirements, or both, of Section 382.309 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the followup alcohol or controlled substances test requirements, or both, of Section 382.311 of that title, the department may use those test results to monitor drivers who are motor carriers.

(3) Evidence derived from a positive test result in the possession of a motor carrier shall not be admissible in a criminal prosecution concerning unlawful possession, sale, or distribution of controlled substances.

(c) A drug or alcohol testing consortium, as defined in Section 382.107 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall mail a copy of all drug and alcohol positive test result summaries to the
 department within three days of the test. This requirement applies only to drug and alcohol positive tests of those drivers employed by motor carriers who operate terminals within this state.

(d) A transit agency receiving federal financial assistance under Section 3, 9, or 18 of the Federal Transit Act, or under Section 103(e)(4) of Title 23 of the United States Code, shall comply with the controlled substances and alcohol use and testing requirements of the United States Secretary of Transportation as set forth in Part 655 (commencing with Section 655.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) The owner-operator shall notify all other motor carriers with whom he or she is under contract when the owner-operator has met the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 15242. Notwithstanding subdivision (i), a violation of this subdivision is an infraction.

(f) Except as provided in Section 382.301 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, an applicant for employment as a commercial driver or an owner-operator seeking to provide transportation services and meeting the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 34624, may not be placed on duty by a motor carrier until a preemployment test for controlled substances and alcohol use meeting the requirements of the federal regulations referenced in subdivision (a) have been completed and a negative test result has been reported.

(g) An applicant for employment as a commercial driver or an owner-operator, seeking to provide transportation services and meeting the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 34624, may not be placed on duty by a motor carrier until the motor carrier has completed a full investigation of the driver’s employment history meeting the requirements of the
 federal regulations cited under subdivision (a). Every motor carrier, whether making or receiving inquiries concerning a driver’s history, shall document all activities it has taken to comply with this subdivision.

(h) A motor carrier that utilizes a preemployment screening service to review applications is in compliance with the employer duties under subdivisions (e) and (f) if the preemployment screening services that are provided satisfy the requirements of state and federal law and the motor carrier abides by any findings that would, under federal law, disqualify an applicant from operating a commercial vehicle.

(i) It is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for six months and a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both the imprisonment and fine, for a person to willfully violate this section. As used in this subdivision, “willfully”
 has the same meaning as defined in Section 7 of the Penal Code.

(j) This section does not apply to a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 or 830.2 of the Penal Code, who is authorized to drive vehicles described in Section 34500, or to a firefighter, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 15250.6, who is authorized to operate firefighting equipment as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 15250.6, if that peace officer or firefighter is participating in a substance abuse detection program within the scope of his or her employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 59.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

34520.3.

(a) For the purposes of this section, a “school transportation vehicle” is a vehicle that is not a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, or youth bus, and is used by a school district or county office of education for the primary purpose of transporting children.

(b) A school district or county office of education that employs drivers to drive a school transportation vehicle, and the driver of those vehicles, who are not otherwise required to participate in a testing program of
 the United States Secretary of Transportation, shall participate in a program that is consistent with the controlled substances and alcohol use and testing requirements of the United States Secretary of Transportation that apply to schoolbus drivers and are set forth in Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101) of, and Sections 392.5(a)(1) and (3) of, Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section be implemented in a manner that does not require a school district or county office of education to administer a program for drivers of school transportation vehicles that imposes controlled substance and alcohol use and testing requirements greater than those applicable to school bus drivers under existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

34520.5.

(a) All employers of drivers who operate paratransit vehicles, and the drivers of those vehicles, who are not otherwise required to participate in a testing program of the United States Secretary of Transportation, shall participate in a program consistent with the controlled substances and alcohol use and testing requirements of the United States Secretary of Transportation as set forth in Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101), Part 653 (commencing with Section 653.1), or Part 654 (commencing with Section 654.1) of Title 49 of the
 Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Section 34520 is applicable to any controlled substances or alcohol testing program undertaken under this section.

(c) The employer of a paratransit vehicle driver shall participate in the pull notice system defined in Section 1808.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14.85. MOTOR CARRIERS OF PROPERTY PERMIT ACT [34600. - 34672.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [34600. - 34605.]

34600.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Carriers of Property Permit Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 53.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

34601.

(a) As used in this division, “motor carrier of property” means any person who operates any commercial motor vehicle as defined in subdivision (c). “Motor carrier of property” does not include a household mover, as defined in Section 19225.5 of the Business and Professions Code, a household mover transporting used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures under its household mover permit pursuant to Section 19237 of the Business and Professions Code, persons providing only transportation of passengers, or a passenger stage corporation transporting baggage and express upon a passenger vehicle incidental to the transportation of passengers.

(b) As used in this division,
 “for-hire motor carrier of property” means a motor carrier of property as defined in subdivision (a) who transports property for compensation.

(c) (1) As used in this division, except as provided in paragraph (2), a “commercial motor vehicle” means any self-propelled vehicle listed in subdivisions (a), (b), (f), (g), and (k) of Section 34500, any motortruck of two or more axles that is more than 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight rating, and any other motor vehicle used to transport property for compensation.

(2) As used in this division, “commercial motor vehicle” does not include any of the following:

(A) Vehicles identified in subdivision (f) of Section 34500, if the gross vehicle weight rating of
 the towing vehicle is 10,000 pounds or less.

(B) Vehicles identified in subdivision (g) of Section 34500, if the hazardous material transportation does not require the display of placards under Section 27903, a license under Section 32000.5, or a hazardous waste transporter registration under Section 25163 of the Health and Safety Code, and the vehicle is not operated in commercial use.

(C) Vehicles operated by a household mover, as defined in Section 19225.5 of the Business and Professions Code, under the household mover permit pursuant to Section 19237 of that code.

(D) Vehicles operated by a household mover to transport used office, store, and institution furniture and fixtures under its household mover
 permit pursuant to Section 19237 of the Business and Professions Code.

(E) Pickup trucks as defined in Section 471, if the conditions in subparagraphs (A) and (B) are also met.

(F) Two-axle daily rental trucks with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 26,001 pounds, when operated in noncommercial use.

(G) Vehicles never operated in commercial use, including motortrucks or two-axle truck tractors, with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 26,001 pounds, when operated singly, or, when used to tow a camp trailer, trailer coach, fifth-wheel travel trailer, trailer designed to transport watercraft, or a utility trailer, never operated in commercial use. Vehicle combinations described in this subparagraph are not
 subject to Section 27900, 34501.12, or 34507.5.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, “private carrier” means a motor carrier of property, who transports only their own property, including, but not limited to, the delivery of goods sold by that carrier.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 24.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

34602.

As used in this division, “fund” means the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 22.   Effective September 23, 2002.   Operative July 1, 2003, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

34603.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Public Utilities Commission, the Bureau of Household Goods and Services, and the State Board of Equalization shall furnish, upon request, whatever information from their records may be required to assist the department in the effective development and enforcement of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 25.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

34604.

The department may adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary to administer this division. The department may also adopt rules and regulations necessary to administer civil sanction proceedings and impose fines for failure to comply with Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500), or this division, or regulations adopted pursuant to this code.
